Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 2

Advances to Social Services Contractors

71-1-201. Advance payment.

Organizations, businesses, or institutions engaged in contracts with the state to provide social services to third parties, including Title XX (42 U.S.C. §§ 1397 et seq.), weatherization, low income energy assistance and other community services administered or funded by the department of human services, that are partially funded by federal grants provided on a cost reimbursement basis, may request advance payment from the state.

Acts 1976, ch. 454, § 1; T.C.A., § 14-2401; Acts 1984, ch. 789, § 1; T.C.A., §14-32-101.

Cross-References. Community grant agencies, title 8, ch. 4, part 4.

71-1-202. Application to state agency or department.

Organizations or businesses having state contracts to provide services may make application to the state agency or department having jurisdiction over the contractor for advance payment. No funds shall be released to the contractor until the third party contractor has demonstrated that state matching fund requirements have been met.

Acts 1976, ch. 454, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 14-2402, 14-32-102.

71-1-203. Approval — Procedure.

Upon approving an application for funds, the state agency or department with jurisdiction over the contractor shall forward the application to the director of accounts for payment.

Acts 1976, ch. 454, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 14-2403, 14-32-103.

71-1-204. Limitation on use of funds.

Funds provided under this part shall only be used to cover costs incurred by third party social service contractors to cover necessary capital expenditures, to provide cash flow, or for other proper purposes where payment is required in cash and cost reimbursement is unacceptable.

Acts 1976, ch. 454, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 14-2404, 14-32-104.

71-1-205. Procedures for advance payments — Limitation — Appropriation.

The commissioner of finance and administration is directed to establish procedures to provide for the advance payments authorized in § 71-1-201. At the termination of the contract or upon termination of provision of contracted social service by the agency, the department of human services shall withhold any outstanding advance from funds otherwise payable to the agency under the contract with the department.

The advance payments shall not exceed an amount appropriated for the advance payments in the general appropriations act for each fiscal year.

Acts 1976, ch. 454, § 5; 1978, ch. 887, § 1; T.C.A., § 14-2405; Acts 1984, ch. 789, § 2; T.C.A., §14-32-105.

71-1-126. Review of state medicaid program.

71-1-129. “Parents as first teachers” pilot projects.